Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TANF HOUSING PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “TANF” means aid or services provided  in the
temporary assistance for needy families program under ORS 412.006.
(2) The TANF Housing Pilot Program is created in the Housing and  Community Services
Department to provide, in collaboration with local offices  of the Department of Human Ser-
vices and local housing services providers, housing  stabilization services to families receiving
TANF. The Housing and Community Services Department, in consultation with  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, shall establish:
(a) Application procedures and eligibility requirements for grants to be awarded to  up to
four pilot projects operated by local housing services providers, in at least  one rural and at
least one urban area, to provide housing stabilization services.
(b) Requirements for grantees, including requirements that grantees:
(A) Develop a collaborative  referral process with the local offices of the Department of
Human Services to  facilitate the referral of TANF families who are homeless or at risk of
homelessness; and
(B) Use the grants awarded by the  program to leverage housing resources that are
available in the local communities to improve the housing stability of TANF families.
(3) Grants awarded under subsection (2) of this section shall  be awarded based on need
and on performance and may be awarded to local housing services providers  individually or
to a group of two or more local housing services providers.
(4) The Housing and Community Services Department and the Department  of Human
Services shall track and compile:
(a) The number of TANF families  needing housing stabilization services to prevent or end
homelessness;
(b) The  number of TANF families served with funding from the pilot program and the
type of services that were provided;
(c) The outcomes of the housing referrals for individual TANF families;
(d) The success of the pilot program in preventing homelessness or providing housing to
TANF families who were homeless; and
Enrolled House Bill 2032 (HB 2032-B) Page 1
(e) Additional barriers faced by TANF families in securing and retaining housing.
(5) No later than September  15, 2021, the Housing and Community Services Department,
in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall report to  the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services, in the manner provided in
ORS 192.245, the data compiled under subsection (4) of this section, with  an analysis of the
data and recommendations for legislative changes necessary to address the barriers  to
housing stability faced by TANF families.
MENTAL AND BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(b) “TANF” means aid or services provided in the temporary assistance for needy fami-
lies program under ORS 412.006.
(2) The Oregon Health  Authority, in consultation with the Department of Human Ser-
vices, shall administer a Mental and Behavioral Health Pilot Program to award grants to  up
to four coordinated  care organizations for the purpose of assessing potential gaps in access
by TANF recipients to mental and behavioral health services  and to drug and alcohol treat-
ment services through the state medical assistance program.
(3) The authority, in consultation with the department, shall:
(a) Select at least one coordinated care  organization serving rural areas and at least one
coordinated care organization serving urban areas to participate in the pilot program; and
(b) Adopt by rule application procedures and eligibility requirements for grant recipients,
including, but not limited to, a demonstrated commitment  to partner with local offices of the
Department of Human Services, hospitals and health systems  that are located in the ge-
ographic area served by the coordinated care organization.
(4) At a minimum, grant recipients shall develop and implement a:
(a) Survey or assessment process to identify TANF applicants with a  need for mental
health or substance abuse services;
(b) Process to  refer TANF recipients with identified needs for services to the level of care
appropriate to their need; and
(c) Process for tracking the results of the referrals.
(5) A coordinated care organization that  receives a grant from the pilot program shall
collect and report to the authority, in the manner prescribed by  the authority, the following
information:
(a) The number of TANF  recipients screened for mental health or substance abuse ser-
vices;
(b) The number of TANF recipients with an identified need for mental health or  sub-
stance abuse services; and
(c) For TANF recipients with an identified need  for mental health or substance abuse
services:
(A) The number of  TANF recipients referred by the coordinated care organization for
mental health or substance abuse services;
(B) The number of referrals that resulted in a visit with a health care  provider and the
time that elapsed between the referral and the visit;
(C) Whether the TANF recipient was enrolled in a patient-centered primary care home
at the time of the visit or as a result of the visit;
(D) The number  of TANF recipients for whom a treatment plan was established or who
had a follow-up appointment with a primary health care provider and the services provided;
(E) Other factors indicating that the TANF recipient accessed appropriate  services in a
timely manner; and
Enrolled House Bill 2032 (HB 2032-B) Page 2
(F) The barriers faced by the  TANF recipients in accessing the services identified in their
treatment plans.
(6) The pilot program shall begin on or after February 1, 2020.
(7) The authority, in consultation with the department, shall evaluate the effectiveness
of the pilot program based on the  information reported by coordinated care organizations
under subsection (6) of this section and based on the evaluation shall:
(a) Develop educational materials containing best practices learned from the pilot  pro-
gram and make the materials available to coordinated care organizations; and
(b) No  later than March 30, 2022, report to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to health on the need for  mental health and substance abuse services and
provide an assessment of the barriers faced by TANF recipients in accessing  mental health
or substance abuse treatment and services through the state medical  assistance program
and make recommendations for legislative changes necessary to address the  barriers and
meet the need.
EDUCATION AND TRAINING PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.
(1) As used in this section, “TANF” means aid or services provided in the
temporary assistance for needy families program under ORS 412.006.
(2) The Education and Training Pilot  Program is created in the Department of Human
Services for the purpose of providing educational opportunities and vocational  training for
TANF recipients to help  them be more competitive in the job market and achieve careers
that allow the recipients to be safe, healthy and financially stable.
(3) The goal  of the pilot program is to expand the availability of education and vocational
training services to TANF recipients using a comprehensive model that may include:
(a) Continuous one-on-one coaching;
(b) Providing opportunities to network and cultivate productive relationships  for em-
ployment or business;
(c) Facilitating relationships with other  participants in the education or training pro-
grams, such as study partners; and
(d) Providing support service payments for tuition, books and supplies.
(4) The department will provide funding to community-based entities through a compet-
itive application process.  In selecting entities to receive funding, the department shall give
priority to entities serving rural areas or areas where it is difficult to access  education or
vocational training through existing programs.
(5) Recipients of funds shall customize the services offered to meet the unique needs of
TANF recipients in their communities and the job markets in their communities.
(6) The department shall establish outcome measures and entities participating  in the
pilot program must report data necessary for the  department to assess the efficacy of each
project and the services provided.
(7) No later than September 15, 2021, the department shall report to the interim  com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to human services the findings  from the pilot
program and recommendations for  legislative changes necessary to implement the practices
that were most successful in meeting the goals of the pilot program.
SUNSET
SECTION 4.
Sections 1 to 3 of this 2019 Act are repealed on July 1, 2022.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled House Bill 2032 (HB 2032-B) Page 3
SECTION 5. The unit captions used in this 2019 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any  leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2019 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 25, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2032 (HB 2032-B) Page 4